Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.200

Catalytic converters—Trafficking in the second degree. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in catalytic converters in the second degree if the person knowingly traffics six or fewer catalytic converters that have been removed from a motor vehicle, without fulfilling the requirements under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW for lawful transfer.

(2) Trafficking in catalytic converters in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2024 c 301 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.